California statutes. Probate Code
(c) No court order under Section 1880, whether issued as part of an order granting the original petition for appointment of a conservator or issued subsequent thereto, may be granted unless supported by a declaration, filed at or before the hearing on the request, executed by a licensed physician, or a licensed psychologist within the scope of his or her licensure, and stating that the proposed conservatee or the conservatee, as the case may be, lacks the capacity to give an informed consent for any form of medical treatment and the reasons therefor. Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand the scope of practice of psychologists as set forth in the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 19.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1891.

(a) A petition may be filed under this article requesting that the court make an order under Section 1880 or that the court modify or revoke an order made under Section 1880. The petition shall state facts showing that the order requested is appropriate.

(b) The petition may be filed by any of the following:

(1) The conservator.

(2) The conservatee.

(3) The spouse, domestic partner, or any relative or friend of the conservatee.

(c) The petition shall set forth, so far as they are known to the petitioner, the names and addresses of the spouse or domestic partner and of the relatives of the conservatee within the second degree.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1892.

Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1893.

The conservatee shall be produced at the hearing except in the following cases:

(a) Where the conservatee is out of state when served and is not the petitioner.

(b) Where the conservatee is unable to attend the hearing by reason of medical inability established (1) by the affidavit or certificate of a licensed medical practitioner or (2) if the conservatee is an adherent of a religion whose tenets and practices call for reliance on prayer alone for healing and is under treatment by an accredited practitioner of that religion, by the affidavit of the practitioner. The affidavit or certificate is evidence only of the conservatee’s inability to attend the hearing and shall not be considered in determining the issue of the legal capacity of the conservatee. Emotional or psychological instability is not good cause for the absence of the conservatee from the hearing unless, by reason of such instability, attendance at the hearing is likely to cause serious and immediate physiological damage to the conservatee.

(c) Where the court investigator has reported to the court that the conservatee has expressly communicated that the conservatee (1) is not willing to attend the hearing and (2) does not wish to contest the petition, and the court makes an order that the conservatee need not attend the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1894.

If the petition alleges that the conservatee is not willing to attend the hearing or upon receipt of an affidavit or certificate attesting to the medical inability of the conservatee to attend the hearing, the court investigator shall do all of the following:

(a) Interview the conservatee personally.

(b) Inform the conservatee of the contents of the petition, of the nature, purpose, and effect of the proceeding, and of the right of the conservatee to oppose the petition, attend the hearing, be represented by legal counsel, and to have legal counsel appointed by the court if not otherwise represented by legal
 counsel.

(c) Determine whether it appears that the conservatee is unable to attend the hearing and, if able to attend, whether the conservatee is willing to attend the hearing.

(d) Determine whether the conservatee wishes to contest the petition.

(e) Determine whether the conservatee wishes to be represented by legal counsel and, if so, whether the conservatee has retained legal counsel and, if not, whether the conservatee plans to retain legal counsel.

(f) Report to the court in writing, at least five days before the hearing, concerning all of the foregoing, including the conservatee’s express communications concerning both (1) representation by
 legal counsel and (2) whether the conservatee is not willing to attend the hearing and does not wish to contest the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 420, Sec. 37.   (AB 2960)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1895.

(a) The conservatee, the spouse, the domestic partner, a relative, or a friend of the conservatee, the conservator, or any other interested person may appear at the hearing to support or oppose the petition.

(b) Except where the conservatee is absent from the hearing and is not required to attend the hearing under the provisions of Section 1893 and any showing required by Section 1893 has been made, the court shall inform, before granting the petition, the conservatee of all of the following:

(1) The nature and purpose of the proceeding.

(2) The nature and effect on the conservatee’s basic rights of the order requested.

(3) The conservatee has the right to oppose the petition, to be represented by legal counsel if the conservatee so chooses, and to have legal counsel appointed by the court if not otherwise represented by legal counsel.

(c) After the court informs the conservatee of the matters listed in subdivision (b) and before granting the petition, the court shall consult the conservatee to determine the conservatee’s opinion concerning the order requested in the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 420, Sec. 38.   (AB 2960)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1896.

(a) If the court determines that the order requested in the petition is proper, the court shall make the order.

(b) The court, in its discretion, may provide in the order that, unless extended by subsequent order of the court, the order or specific provisions of the order terminate at a time specified in the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1897.

An order of the court under Section 1880 continues in effect until the earliest of the following times:

(1) The time specified in the order, if any.

(2) The time the order is modified or revoked.

(3) The time the conservatorship is terminated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1898.

An order of the court under Section 1880 may be modified or revoked upon a petition made, noticed, and heard by the court in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Capacity of Conservatee to Marry [1900. - 1901.]

1900.

The appointment of a conservator of the person or estate or both does not affect the capacity of the conservatee to marry or to enter into a registered domestic partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 418, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1901.

(a) The court may by order determine whether the conservatee has the capacity to enter into a valid marriage, as provided in Part 1 (commencing with Section 300) of Division 3 of the Family Code, or to enter into a registered domestic partnership, as provided in Section 297 of the Family Code, at the time the order is made.

(b) A petition for an order under this section may be filed by the conservator of the person or estate or both, the conservatee, any relative or friend of the conservatee, or any interested person.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 418, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Disqualification From Voting [1910. - 1910.]

1910.

(a) If the court determines the conservatee is incapable of communicating, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process, the court shall by order disqualify the conservatee from voting pursuant to Section 2208 or 2209 of the Elections Code.

(b) The conservatee shall not be disqualified from voting on the basis that he or she does, or would need to do, any of the following to complete an affidavit of voter registration:

(1) Signs the affidavit of voter registration with a mark or a cross pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2150 of the Elections Code.

(2) Signs the affidavit of voter registration by means of a signature stamp pursuant to Section 354.5 of the Elections Code.

(3) Completes the affidavit of voter registration with the assistance of another person pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2150 of the Elections Code.

(4) Completes the affidavit of voter registration with reasonable accommodations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 736, Sec. 12.   (SB 589)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Sterilization [1950. - 1969.]

1950.

The Legislature recognizes that the right to exercise choice over matters of procreation is fundamental and may not be denied to an individual on the basis of disability. This chapter is enacted for the benefit of those persons with developmental disabilities who, despite those disabilities, are capable of engaging in sexual activity yet who, because of those disabilities, are unable to give the informed, voluntary consent necessary to their fully exercising the right to procreative choice, which includes the right to choose sterilization.

However, the Legislature further recognizes that the power to sterilize is subject to abuse and, historically, has been abused. It is the intent of the Legislature that no individual shall be sterilized solely by reason of a developmental disability and that no individual who knowingly opposes sterilization be sterilized involuntarily. It is further the intent of the Legislature that this chapter shall be applied in accord with the overall intent of Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code that persons with developmental disabilities be provided with those services needed to enable them to live more normal, independent, and productive lives, including assistance and training that might obviate the need for sterilization.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1951.

(a) No person who has the ability to consent to his or her sterilization shall be sterilized pursuant to this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the meanings given:

(1) “Consent to sterilization” means making a voluntary decision to undergo sterilization after being fully informed about, and after fully understanding the nature and consequences of, sterilization.

(2) “Voluntary” means performed while competent to make the decision, and as a matter of free choice and will and not in response to coercion, duress, or undue influence.

(3) “Fully understanding the nature and consequences of sterilization,” includes, but is not limited to, the ability to understand each of the following:

(A) That the individual is free to withhold or withdraw consent to the procedure at any time before the sterilization without affecting the right to future care or treatment and without loss or withdrawal of any publicly funded program benefits to which the individual might be otherwise entitled.

(B) Available alternative methods of family planning and birth control.

(C) That the sterilization procedure is considered to be irreversible.

(D) The specific sterilization procedure to be performed.

(E) The discomforts and risks that may accompany or follow the performing of the procedure, including an explanation of the type and possible effects of any anesthetic to be used.

(F) The benefits or advantages that may be expected as a result of the sterilization.

(G) The approximate length of the hospital stay.

(H) The approximate length of time for recovery.

(c) The court shall appoint a facilitator or interpreter if such a person’s assistance would enable the person named in the petition to understand any of these factors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1952.

The conservator of an adult, or any person authorized to file a petition for the appointment of a conservator under paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 1820, may file a petition under this chapter for appointment of a limited conservator authorized to consent to the sterilization of an adult with a developmental disability. The content of the petition under this chapter shall conform to the provisions of Section 1821 and in addition allege that the person for whom sterilization is proposed has a developmental disability as defined in Section 1420 and shall allege specific reasons why court-authorized sterilization is deemed necessary. A petition under this chapter shall be considered separately from any contemporaneous petition for appointment of a conservator under this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1953.

At least 90 days before the hearing on the petition under this chapter, notice of the time and place of the hearing and a copy of the petition shall be served on the person named in the petition and, if the petitioner is not the conservator of the person, on the conservator, if any. Service shall be made in the manner provided in Section 415.10 or Section 415.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure or in such manner as may be authorized by the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.

In any proceeding under this chapter, if the person named in the petition for court authorization to consent to sterilization has not retained legal counsel and does not plan to retain legal counsel, the court shall immediately appoint the public defender or private counsel to represent the individual for whom sterilization is proposed. Counsel shall undertake the representation with the presumption that the individual opposes the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.5.

(a) The court shall appoint a facilitator for the person named in the petition, who shall assist the person named in the petition to do all of the following:

(1) Understand the nature of the proceedings.

(2) Understand the evaluation process required by Section 1955.

(3) Communicate his or her views.

(4) Participate as fully as possible in the proceedings.

(b) All of the following factors shall be considered by the court in appointing a facilitator:

(1) The preference of the person named in the petition.

(2) The proposed facilitator’s personal knowledge of the person named in the petition.

(3) The proposed facilitator’s ability to communicate with the person named in the petition, when that person is nonverbal, has limited verbal skills, or relies on alternative modes of communication.

(4) The proposed facilitator’s knowledge of the developmental disabilities service system.

(c) The petitioner may not be appointed as the facilitator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1955.

(a) The court shall request the director of the appropriate regional center for the developmentally disabled to coordinate an investigation and prepare and file a written report thereon. The appropriate regional center for purposes of this section is (1) the regional center of which the person named in the petition is a client, (2) if the individual named in the petition is not a client of any regional center, the regional center responsible for the area in which the individual is then living, or (3) such other regional center as may be in the best interests of the individual. The report shall be based upon comprehensive medical, psychological, and sociosexual evaluations of the individual conducted pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), and shall address, but shall not be limited to, each of the factors listed in Section 1958. A copy of the report shall be provided to each of the parties at least 15 days prior to the hearing.

(b) Prior to the hearing on the issue of sterilization, the person who is proposed to be sterilized shall be personally examined by two physicians, one of whom shall be a surgeon competent to perform the procedure, and one psychologist or clinical social worker, each of whom has been mutually agreed to by the petitioner and counsel for the person named in the petition or, if agreement is not reached, appointed by the court from a panel of qualified professionals. At the request of counsel for the person named in the petition, the court shall appoint one additional psychologist, clinical social worker, or physician named by counsel. Any psychologist or clinical social worker and, to the extent feasible, any physicians conducting an examination shall have had experience with persons who have developmental disabilities. To the extent feasible, each of the examiners shall also have knowledge and experience relating to sociosexual skills and behavior. The examinations shall be at county expense subject to Section 1963.

(c) The examiners shall consider all available alternatives to sterilization and shall recommend sterilization only if no suitable alternative is available. Each examiner shall prepare a written, comprehensive report containing all relevant aspects of the person’s medical, psychological, family, and sociosexual conditions. Each examiner shall address those factors specified in Section 1958 related to his or her particular area of expertise. In considering the factors in subdivision (a) of, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of, Section 1958, each examiner shall include information regarding the intensity, extent, and recentness of the person’s education and training, if any, regarding human sexuality, including birth control methods and parenting skills, and in addition, shall consider whether the individual would benefit from training provided by persons competent in education and training of persons with comparable intellectual impairments. If an examiner recommends against sterilization, the examiner shall set forth in his or her report available alternatives, including, as warranted, recommendations for sex education, parent training, or training in the use of alternative methods of contraception. Copies of each report shall be furnished at least 30 days prior to the hearing on the petition to the person or persons who filed the petition, the conservator, if any, and counsel for the person proposed to be sterilized, the regional center responsible for the investigation and report required under this section, and such other persons as the court may direct. The court may receive these reports in evidence.

(d) The contents of the reports prepared pursuant to this section shall be confidential. Upon judgment in the action or the proceeding becoming final, the court shall order the contents of the reports sealed.

(e) Regional centers for the developmentally disabled shall compile and maintain lists of persons competent to perform the examinations required by this section. These lists shall be provided to the court. If the person named in the petition resides at a state hospital or other residential care facility, no person conducting an examination pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be an employee of the facility.

(f) Any party to the proceedings has the right to submit additional reports from qualified experts.

(g) Any person who has written a report received in evidence may be subpoenaed and questioned by any party to the proceedings or by the court and when so called is subject to all rules of evidence including those of legal objections as to the qualification of expert witnesses.

(h) No regional center or person acting in his or her capacity as a regional center employee may file a petition under Section 1952.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1956.

The person to whom the petition applies shall be present at the hearing except for reason of medical inability. Emotional or psychological instability is not good cause for the absence of the proposed conservatee from the hearing unless, by reason of the instability, attendance at the hearing is likely to cause serious and immediate physiological damage to the proposed conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1957.

To the greatest extent possible, the court shall elicit and take into account the views of the individual for whom sterilization is proposed in determining whether sterilization is to be authorized.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1958.

The court may authorize the conservator of a person proposed to be sterilized to consent to the sterilization of that person only if the court finds that the petitioner has established all of the following beyond a reasonable doubt:

(a) The person named in the petition is incapable of giving consent to sterilization, as defined in Section 1951, and the incapacity is in all likelihood permanent.

(b) Based on reasonable medical evidence, the individual is fertile and capable of procreation.

(c) The individual is capable of engaging in, and is likely to engage in sexual activity at the present or in the near future under circumstances likely to result in pregnancy.

(d) Either of the following:

(1) The nature and extent of the individual’s disability as determined by empirical evidence and not solely on the basis of any standardized test, renders him or her permanently incapable of caring for a child, even with appropriate training and reasonable assistance.

(2) Due to a medical condition, pregnancy or childbirth would pose a substantially elevated risk to the life of the individual to such a degree that, in the absence of other appropriate methods of contraception, sterilization would be deemed medically necessary for an otherwise nondisabled woman under similar circumstances.

(e) All less invasive contraceptive methods including supervision are unworkable even with training and assistance, inapplicable, or medically contraindicated. Isolation and segregation shall not be considered as less invasive means of contraception.

(f) The proposed method of sterilization entails the least invasion of the body of the individual.

(g) The current state of scientific and medical knowledge does not suggest either (1) that a reversible sterilization procedure or other less drastic contraceptive method will shortly be available, or (2) that science is on the threshold of an advance in the treatment of the individual’s disability.

(h) The person named in the petition has not made a knowing objection to his or her sterilization. For purposes of this subdivision, an individual may be found to have knowingly objected to his or her sterilization notwithstanding his or her inability to give consent to sterilization as defined in Section 1951. In the case of persons who are nonverbal, have limited verbal ability to communicate, or who rely on alternative modes of communication, the court shall ensure that adequate effort has been made to elicit the actual views of the individual by the facilitator appointed pursuant to Section 1954.5, or by any other person with experience in communicating with developmentally disabled persons who communicate using similar means.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1959.

The fact that, due to the nature or severity of his or her disability, a person for whom an authorization to consent to sterilization is sought may be vulnerable to sexual conduct by others that would be deemed unlawful, shall not be considered by the court in determining whether sterilization is to be authorized under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1960.

If the person named in the petition already has a conservator, the court may authorize that person to consent to sterilization or may appoint another person as limited conservator under the provisions of this chapter. The court shall ensure that the person or agency designated as conservator under this chapter is capable of adequately representing and safeguarding the interests of the conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1961.

A sterilization procedure authorized under this chapter shall not include hysterectomy or castration. However, if the report prepared under Section 1955 indicates that hysterectomy or castration is a medically necessary treatment, regardless of the need for sterilization, the court shall proceed pursuant to Section 2357.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1962.

(a) Any court order granting a petition under this chapter shall be accompanied by a written statement of decision pursuant to Section 632 of the Code of Civil Procedure detailing the factual and legal bases for the court’s determination on each of the findings required under Section 1958.

(b) When a judgment authorizing the conservator of a person to consent to the sterilization is rendered, an appeal is automatically taken by the person proposed to be sterilized without any action by that person, or by his or her counsel. The Judicial Council shall provide by rule for notice of and procedure for the appeal. The appeal shall have precedence over other cases in the court in which the appeal is pending.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1963.

(a) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court, after inquiring into financial ability, may make an order based upon their ability that any one or more of the following persons pay court costs and fees in whole or in part as in the opinion of the court is proper and in any installments and manner which is both reasonable and compatible with ability to pay:

(1) The person to whom the petition applies.

(2) The petitioner.

(3) Any person liable for the support and maintenance of the person to whom the petition applies.

(b) An order under subdivision (a) may be enforced in the same manner as a money judgment.

(c) For the purposes of this section, court costs and fees include the costs of any examination or investigation ordered by the court, expert witnesses’ fees, and the costs and fees of the court-appointed public defender or private counsel representing the person to whom the petition applies.

(d) Any fees and costs not ordered to be paid by persons under subdivision (a) are a charge against and paid out of the treasury of the county on order of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1964.

An order of the court authorizing a conservator to consent to sterilization which is upheld on appeal automatically expires in one year from the final determination on appeal unless earlier terminated by the court. A conservatorship established for the sole purpose of authorizing a conservator to consent to sterilization under this chapter shall automatically terminate upon completion of the sterilization procedure or upon expiration of the court’s order authorizing the conservator to consent to sterilization, whichever occurs first. If, upon the expiration of the court’s order under this chapter, the person named as conservator determines that the conservatorship is still required for the purpose of this chapter, he or she may petition the court for reappointment as conservator for a succeeding six-month period upon a showing of good cause as to why any sterilization authorized by the court has not been completed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1965.

Any court order made pursuant to this chapter granting authority to consent to sterilization shall be stayed pending a final determination on appeal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.

After the filing of a first petition for sterilization pursuant to this chapter and a determination by the court that any one or more of the conditions required in Section 1958 has not been proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and that therefore authorization for the proposed sterilization should not be given by the court, a subsequent petition may be filed only on the showing of a material change in circumstances.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.

(a) The sterilization of a person in accordance with this chapter does not render the petitioner or any person participating in the conservatorship proceedings or sterilization liable, either civilly or criminally, except for any injury caused by negligent or willful misconduct in the performance of the sterilization.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), any individual who petitions for authorization to consent to sterilization knowing that the person to whom the petition relates is capable of giving consent to sterilization as defined in Section 1951 is guilty of a misdemeanor, and may be civilly liable to the person concerning whom sterilization was sought.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1968.

This chapter does not prohibit medical treatment or surgery required for other medical reasons and in which sterilization is an unavoidable or medically probable consequence, but is not the object of the treatment or surgery.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1969.

Nothing in this chapter shall infringe on the right of persons with developmental disabilities who are capable of giving consent to sterilization to give that consent without the necessity of a court order or substitute decisionmaker.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Unwarranted Petitions [1970. - 1970.]

1970.

(a) The Legislature finds that unwarranted petitions, applications, or motions other than discovery motions after a conservatorship has been established create an environment that can be harmful to the conservatee and are inconsistent with the goal of protecting the conservatee.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 391 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if a person other than the conservatee files a petition for termination of the conservatorship, or instruction to the conservator, that is unmeritorious or intended to harass or annoy the conservator, and the person has previously filed pleadings in the conservatorship proceedings that were unmeritorious or intended to harass or annoy the conservator, the petition shall be grounds for the court to determine that the person is a vexatious litigant for the purposes of Title 3A (commencing with Section 391) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. For these purposes, the term “new litigation” shall include petitions for visitation, termination of the conservatorship, or instruction to the conservator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 293, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Interstate Jurisdiction, Transfer, and Recognition: California Conservatorship Jurisdiction Act  [1980. - 2033.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1980. - 1986.]

1980.

(a) By enacting this chapter, it is the Legislature’s intent to enact a modified version of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.

(b) This chapter may be cited as the “California Conservatorship Jurisdiction Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1981.

(a) (1) This chapter does not apply to a minor, regardless of whether the minor is or was married.

(2) This chapter does not apply to any proceeding in which a person is appointed to provide personal care or property administration for a minor, including, but not limited to, a guardianship under Part 2 (commencing with Section 1500).

(b) This chapter does not apply to any proceeding in which a person is involuntarily committed to a mental health facility or subjected to other involuntary mental health care, including, but not limited to, any of the following proceedings or any proceeding that is similar in substance:

(1) A proceeding under Sections 1026 to 1027, inclusive, of the Penal Code.

(2) A proceeding under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(3) A proceeding under Article 4 (commencing with Section 2960) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(4) A proceeding under Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(5) A proceeding under Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, which is also known as the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act.

(6) A proceeding under Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of
 Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(7) A proceeding under Article 4 (commencing with Section 6600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) Article 3 (commencing with Section 2001) does not apply to an adult with a developmental disability, or to any proceeding in which a person is appointed to provide personal care or property administration for an adult with a developmental disability, including, but not limited to, the following types of proceedings:

(1) A proceeding under
 Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 416) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A limited conservatorship under subdivision (d) of Section 1801.

(3) A proceeding under Section 4825 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) A proceeding under Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) Application of this chapter to a conservatee with major neurocognitive disorder is subject to the express limitations of Sections 2002 and 2016, as well as the other
 requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 122, Sec. 4.   (SB 413)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1982.

In this chapter:

(a) “Adult” means an individual who has attained 18 years of age.

(b) “Conservatee” means an adult for whom a conservator of the estate, a conservator of the person, or a conservator of the person and estate has been appointed.

(c) “Conservator” means a person appointed by the court to serve as a conservator of the estate, a conservator of the person, or a conservator of the person and estate.

(d) “Conservator of the estate” means a person appointed by the court to administer the property of an adult, including,
 but not limited to, a person appointed for that purpose under subdivision (b) of Section 1801.

(e) “Conservator of the person” means a person appointed by the court to make decisions regarding the person of an adult, including, but not limited to, a person appointed for that purpose under subdivision (a) of Section 1801.

(f) “Conservator of the person and estate” means a person appointed by the court to make decisions regarding the person of an adult and to administer the property of that adult, including, but not limited to, a person appointed for those purposes under subdivision (c) of Section 1801.

(g) “Conservatorship order” means an order appointing a conservator of the estate, a conservator of the person, or a conservator of the person and estate in a conservatorship proceeding.

(h) “Conservatorship proceeding” means a judicial proceeding in which an order for the appointment of a conservator of the estate, a conservator of the person, or a conservator of the person and estate is sought or has been issued.

(i) “Party” means the conservatee, proposed conservatee, petitioner, conservator, proposed conservator, or any other person allowed by the court to participate in a conservatorship proceeding.

(j) “Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(k) “Proposed conservatee” means an adult for whom a
 conservatorship order is sought.

(l) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(m) Notwithstanding Section 74, “state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1983.

A court of this state may treat a foreign country as if it were a state for the purpose of applying this article and Articles 2, 3, and 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1984.

(a) A court of this state may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter. The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), the court shall make a record of the communication. The record may be limited to the fact that the communication occurred.

(b) Courts may communicate concerning schedules, calendars, court records, and other administrative matters without making a record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1985.

(a) In a conservatorship proceeding in this state, a court of this state may request the appropriate court of another state to do any of the following:

(1) Hold an evidentiary hearing.

(2) Order a person in that state to produce evidence or give testimony pursuant to procedures of that state.

(3) Order that an evaluation or assessment be made of the proposed conservatee.

(4) Order any appropriate investigation of a person involved in a proceeding.

(5) Forward to the court of this state a certified copy of the transcript or other record of a hearing under paragraph (1) or any other proceeding, any evidence otherwise produced under paragraph (2), and any evaluation or assessment prepared in compliance with an order under paragraph (3) or (4).
